Colorado, session 2026A, HB1071.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-110.5, amend
(2) introductory portion, (2)(g)(I), and (2)(g)(V) as follows:
42-4-110.5. Automated vehicle identification systems - school
buses - exceptions to liability - penalty - contracting - limits on use of
photographs and video - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.
(2) A county, city and county, or municipality may adopt an
ordinance authorizing the use of an automated vehicle identification
system to detect violations A VIOLATION of A traffic regulations
REGULATION adopted by the county, city and county, or municipality, or
the state OR a county, a city and county, or a municipality may utilize an
automated vehicle identification system to detect A traffic violations
VIOLATION under state law, subject to the following conditions and
limitations and, as applicable, the requirements for state highways set
forth in and any rules adopted by the department of transportation
pursuant to subsection (2.5) of this section:
(g) (I) The state OR a county, a city and county, or a municipality
shall not issue a notice of violation or civil penalty assessment notice for
a violation detected using an automated vehicle identification system
unless the violation occurred within a school zone, as defined in section
42-4-615; within a residential neighborhood; within a maintenance,
construction, or repair zone designated pursuant to section 42-4-614;
along a street that borders a municipal park; or along a street OR STATE
HIGHWAY or A portion of a street OR STATE HIGHWAY that a county, city
and county, or municipality, by ordinance or by a resolution of its
-2- 1071

governing body, designates as an automated vehicle identification
corridor, on which designated corridor the county, city and county, or
municipality may locate an automated vehicle identification system to
detect violations A VIOLATION of a TRAFFIC REGULATION ADOPTED BY THE
STATE OR A county, city and county, or municipal traffic regulation or a
traffic violation under state law MUNICIPALITY.
(V) (A) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2)(g)(I) of
this section, The state, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY may
locate an automated vehicle identification system on a STATE highway
that is a part of the federal interstate highway system and may issue a
notice of violation or a civil penalty assessment notice for a traffic
violation under state law VIOLATION OF A TRAFFIC REGULATION ADOPTED
BY THE STATE, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY detected using
the automated vehicle identification system.
(B) A county, a city and county, or a municipality shall not locate
an automated vehicle identification system or create an automated vehicle
identification corridor on any highway that is a part of the federal
interstate highway system.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-3- 1071

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- 1071